Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2,107
Dual contracts; substituting one instrument for another; fraudulent instrument; unlawful.

No person, firm, or corporation, or any agent or employee of any such firm or corporation shall, with intent to defraud (1) make or issue a dual contract for the purchase of real property, (2) substitute one instrument in writing for another and by such means cause the making of a loan or the extension of credit, with respect to transactions whereby either the title to real property is transferred or valuable improvements are placed on real property in this state, whether for the benefit of the inducer or another, or (3) induce by any fraudulent instrument in writing the making of a loan or the extension of credit as a part of a transaction whereby either the title to real property is transferred or valuable improvements are placed on real property in this state, whether for the benefit of the inducer or another.

Laws 1969, c. 610, § 2, p. 2477.